Hawaii statutes.
[§342L-21] Priority in courts. All
actions brought pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to the rules adopted under
this chapter shall in the discretion of the court receive priority in the
courts of the State. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §6]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next